District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.09

Making or publishing material false statements.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any company who subscribes to, makes or concurs in making or publishing any annual or other statement required by law, knowing the same to contain any material statement which is false, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1069, ch. 792, ch. II, § 9
1981 Ed., § 35-1512.
1973 Ed., § 35-1312.